District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.55

Reasonable pre-employment travel and relocation expenses and temporary housing allowance.

Pursuant to regulations the Mayor may prescribe, the following expenses may be paid in connection with Executive Service employment:

(1)

Reasonable pre-employment travel expenses for an individual being interviewed for a subordinate agency head position;

(2)

Reasonable relocation expenses for an Executive Service selectee or appointee and his or her immediate family if they are relocating to the District of Columbia from outside the Greater Washington Metropolitan Area; and

(3)

A reasonable temporary housing allowance, for a period not to exceed 60 days, for an Executive Service selectee or appointee and his or her immediate family.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1055
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.
1981 Ed., § 1-611.55.